Illinois, session 104th, HB2689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 20-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/20-15)7    Sec. 20-15. Information on bill or separate statement. 8There shall be printed on each bill, or on a separate slip 9which shall be mailed with the bill:10        (a) a statement itemizing the rate at which taxes have 11    been extended for each of the taxing districts in the 12    county in whose district the property is located, and in 13    those counties utilizing electronic data processing 14    equipment the dollar amount of tax due from the person 15    assessed allocable to each of those taxing districts, 16    including a separate statement of the dollar amount of tax 17    due which is allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois 18    Local Library Act or to any other tax levied by a 19    municipality or township for public library purposes,20        (b) a separate statement for each of the taxing 21    districts of the dollar amount of tax due which is 22    allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois Pension Code 23    or to any other tax levied by a municipality or township   HB2689- 2 -LRB104 07521 HLH 17565 b1    for public pension or retirement purposes,2        (b-1) the dollar amount of tax due that is used to fund 3    a Veterans Assistance Commission under Section 5-2006 of 4    the Counties Code, 5        (b-5) a list of each tax increment financing (TIF) 6    district in which the property is located and the dollar 7    amount of tax due that is allocable to the TIF district, 8        (c) the total tax rate,9        (d) the total amount of tax due, and10        (e) the amount by which the total tax and the tax 11    allocable to each taxing district differs from the 12    taxpayer's last prior tax bill.13    The county treasurer shall ensure that only those taxing 14districts in which a parcel of property is located shall be 15listed on the bill for that property.16    In all counties the statement shall also provide:17        (1) the property index number or other suitable 18    description,19        (2) the assessment of the property,20        (3) the statutory amount of each homestead exemption 21    applied to the property, 22        (4) the assessed value of the property after 23    application of all homestead exemptions, 24        (5) the equalization factors imposed by the county and 25    by the Department, and26        (6) the equalized assessment resulting from the   HB2689- 3 -LRB104 07521 HLH 17565 b1    application of the equalization factors to the basic 2    assessment.3    In all counties which do not classify property for 4purposes of taxation, for property on which a single family 5residence is situated the statement shall also include a 6statement to reflect the fair cash value determined for the 7property. In all counties which classify property for purposes 8of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article IX of the 9Illinois Constitution, for parcels of residential property in 10the lowest assessment classification the statement shall also 11include a statement to reflect the fair cash value determined 12for the property.13    In all counties, the statement must include information 14that certain taxpayers may be eligible for tax exemptions, 15abatements, and other assistance programs and that, for more 16information, taxpayers should consult with the office of their 17township or county assessor and with the Department of 18Revenue. For bills mailed on or after January 1, 2026, the 19statement must include, in bold face type, a list of 20exemptions available to taxpayers and contact information for 21the chief county assessment officer. 22    In counties which use the estimated or accelerated billing 23methods, these statements shall only be provided with the 24final installment of taxes due. The provisions of this Section 25create a mandatory statutory duty. They are not merely 26directory or discretionary. The failure or neglect of the   HB2689- 4 -LRB104 07521 HLH 17565 b1collector to mail the bill, or the failure of the taxpayer to 2receive the bill, shall not affect the validity of any tax, or 3the liability for the payment of any tax.4(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.)